ling073-abe-master/apertium-abe.abe.lexd
LEXICON Particle
niba<itg>:niba
oji<pt><pr>:oji
wji<pt><pr>:wji
alȣmi<pt><pr>:alȣmi
alȣmiwi<pt><pr>:alȣmiwi
ali<pt><pr>:ali
kchi<pt><adj>:kchi
paji<pt>:paji
ȣnda<pt>:ȣnda
ȣda<pt>:ȣda

LEXICON NounPlural
<pl>:{PL}{A}k[aa]
<pl>:{PL}{A}l[nn]

LEXICON AdjectivePlural
<pl>:{PL}{A}k[aa]
<pl>:{PL}{A}l[nn]

LEXICON Possessive(2)
:n{ʻ}   <px1sg>:
:k{ʻ}   <px2sg>:
:w{ʻ}   <px3sg>:{a}
:n{ʻ}   <px1pl_excl>:na
:k{ʻ}   <px1pl_incl>:na
:k{ʻ}   <px2pl>:wȣ
:w{ʻ}   <px3pl>:wȣ

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

PATTERN Number
Numeral+ [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9


LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
